Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2821
Writ; person detained; how designated.

The person to be produced shall be designated by his name, if known, and if that is unknown or uncertain, he may be described in any other way so as to make known who is intended.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 370, p. 808;

R.S.1913, § 9267;

C.S.1922, § 10296;

C.S.1929, § 29-2821;

R.S.1943, § 29-2821.